District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.53

Amendment of articles of incorporation — Procedure before acceptance of subscriptions to shares.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 201, ch. 269, § 53
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 85-254, § 10
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.53.
1981 Ed., § 29-353.
1973 Ed., § 29-921g.